Connecticut, session 2026, HB05341.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Section 4-68dd of the general statutes is repealed and the
2 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
3 (a) [The] Not later than July 1, 2027, the Secretary of the Office of
4 Policy and Management shall, within available appropriations,
5 establish and maintain a single electronic portal available on the Internet
6 and located on the Office of Policy and Management's Internet web site
7 concerning grants administered or provided by state agencies for the
8 purpose of posting all state-funded [municipal] grant applications. Such
9 electronic portal shall be known as the [Municipal] State Grant Portal.
10 (b) The [Municipal] State Grant Portal shall include, but not be
11 limited to: (1) All state-funded [municipal] grant applications, [and
12 municipal reimbursement request forms,] (2) a searchable database for
HB5341 / File No. 193 1

HB5341 File No. 193
13 locating information regarding state-funded [municipal] grants, [and]
14 (3) an Internet web page dedicated to state-funded municipal grant
15 applications and municipal reimbursement request forms, and (4)
16 features to encourage the active recruitment and participation of
17 municipalities and other interested parties in the state-funded
18 [municipal] grant application process.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 4-68dd
GAE Joint Favorable
HB5341 / File No. 193 2

HB5341 File No. 193
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Policy & Mgmt., Off. GF - Cost 200,000 None
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill expands the requirements for a Municipal Grant Portal on
the Office of Policy and Management's (OPM) website to include (1) all
state-funded grant applications, and (2) a webpage dedicated to state
funded municipal grant applications and municipal request forms by
July 1, 2027. This results in a one-time cost of $200,000 to OPM in FY 27
for a consultant to assist in completing this work.
The Out Years
None.
HB5341 / File No. 193 3

HB5341 File No. 193
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5341
AN ACT ESTABLISHING AN ELECTRONIC PORTAL FOR
APPLICATIONS FOR STATE GRANT PROGRAMS.